New York, session 2025-2026, A5488.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 37 of the environmental conservation law is amended 2 by adding a new title 13 to read as follows: 3 TITLE 13 4 WIRE GRILL BRUSHES 5 Section 37-1301. Definitions. 6 37-1303. Prohibition on manufacture, sale, and use of wire grill 7 brushes. 8 37-1305. Preemption. 9 37-1307. Rules and regulations. 10 § 37-1301. Definitions. 11 For purposes of this title, "wire grill brush" shall mean a wire-bris- 12 tled brush used to clean a grill. 13 § 37-1303. Prohibition on manufacture, sale, and use of wire grill 14 brushes. 15 On and after January first, two thousand twenty-six, no person shall 16 manufacture, distribute, sell or offer for sale, or use in the state any 17 wire grill brush. 18 § 37-1305. Preemption. 19 Jurisdiction in all matters pertaining to wire grill brushes which are 20 regulated pursuant to the provisions of this title shall be vested 21 exclusively in the state. 22 § 37-1307. Rules and regulations. 23 The department is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations 24 as it shall deem necessary to implement the provisions of this title. 25 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05166-01-5